Utah statutes.
36-14-4.   Service.

Legislative subpoenas may be served:

(1)  within the state, by the sheriff of the county where service is made, or by his deputy, or by any other person 18 years old or older who is not a member of the entity issuing the subpoena;

(2)  in another state or United States territory, by the sheriff of the county where the service is made, or by his deputy, or by a United States marshal or his deputy;

(3)  in a foreign country:

(a)  by following the procedures prescribed by the law of the foreign country;

(b)  upon an individual, by any person 18 years old or older who is not a member of the entity delivering the subpoena to him personally, and upon a corporation or partnership or association, by any person 18 years old or older who is not a member of the entity delivering the subpoena to an officer, a managing or general agent of the corporation, partnership, or association; or

(c)  by any form of mail requiring a signed receipt, to be addressed and dispatched by the legislative general counsel to the party to be served.



Enacted by Chapter 174, 1989 General Session

